src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
! ====================== !
!! # Bokmål noun morphology 
! ====================== !

!!     ---------------------------------------------------
!!     Declension classes
!!     Main types, from Bokmålsordboka
!!     
!!     f1  bru         brua        bruer           bruene
!!     f2  pumpe       pumpa       pumper          pumpene
!!     f3  søster      søstera     søstre/søstrer  søstrene
!!     m1  stol        stolen      stoler          stolene
!!         bakke       bakken      bakker          bakkene
!!         pumpe       pumpen      pumper          pumpene
!!     m2  lærer       læreren     lærere          lærerne
!!     m3  bever       beveren     bevere          beverne
!!                                 bevrer          bevrene
!!                                 bevre           bevrene
!!     m4  longs       longsen     longs/longser   longsene
!!     n1  slott       slottet     slott           slotta/slottene
!!     n2  eple        eplet       epler           epla/eplene
!!         salt        saltet      salter          salta/saltene
!!     n3  kontor      kontoret    kontor/kontorer kontora/kontorene
!!         høve        høvet       HØVE/høver      høva/høvene
!!         middel      midlet      MIDDEL/midler   midla/midlene
!!     n4  salt        saltet      salter          salta/saltene ??
!!     n5  middel      midlet      midler          midla/midlene ??
!!     n6  kammer      kammeret    kamre/kammer    kamra/kamrene
!!     
!!     Subtypes, mainly from Finsk-norsk ordbok, also system-specific
!!     
!!     x  unclassified, to m1 by default
 !!     mX indecl
!!     m1sg sg only
!!     m1pl pl only
!!     m1b dam
!!     m1b fe, komite
!!     m1V sko pl. sko, skoa/skoene
!!     m1Vb byte, pl. byte/byter, bytene
!!     m1Vc glipp, pl. glipp, glippene
!!     m3V meter pl. meter
!!     m3b finger pl. fingrer/fingre
!!     m3c forelder pl. foreldre
!!     ma alliert, alierte, allierte, allierte
!!     KOLLEGA kollegaer, kolleger
!!     KONTO kontoer, konti
!!     RADIUS radiuser, radii
!!     BROR brødre
!!     FAR fedre
!!     MANN menn
!      
!!     mD gårde, garde, dage  (av gårde)
!!     fD tide (i tide)
!!     nD live (i live)
!      
!!     DATTER døtre
!!     f1b skam
!!     f1X bok, pl. bøker
!!     f1V mus, pl. mus
!!     fGLO glo, pl. glør
!!     f3b lever. def. levra
!      
!!     n1b rom, def. rommet
!!     n1n1b publikum, def. publikumet/publikummet
!!     n1s sg only
!!     n2b program, pl. programmer
!!     n2c kontor, pl. kontor, kontorer
!!     n2s mørke, not pl.
!!     n3b lager, def. lageret
!!     n3c fe, feet
!!     n3d søppel, søppelet/søplet, søppel/søpler, søpla/søplene
!!     n4b faktum, pl. fakta
!!     FORUM forum, forumet, fora/forumer, foraene/forumene
!!     LEKSIKON leksikon, pl. leksika
!!     nMUSEUM museum, museet, museer
!!     nØYE



!! ## Basic paradigms
! ===============

LEXICON mD
+N+Msc+Sg+Indef: # ;
LEXICON fD
+N+Fem+Sg+Indef: # ;
LEXICON nD
+N+Neu+Sg+Indef: # ;


!LEXICON n1n2
!  n1 ;
!  +N+Neu+Pl+Indef:%>er K ;

LEXICON n1n3
  n1 ;
  n3 ;

LEXICON m1n1
  m1 ;
  n1 ;

LEXICON m1n2
  m1 ;
  n2 ;

!LEXICON m1n1f1
!  m1 ;
!  f1 ;
!  n1 ;

LEXICON m1Vcn1
  m1Vc ;
  n1  ;

LEXICON n1n1b 
  n1  ;
  n1b ;

LEXICON m3f3
  m3 ;
  f3 ;

LEXICON f3n3d
  f3 ;
  n3d ;

! Masculines
! ----------

LEXICON mx
!  +X: m1 ; !Temporarily excluding the xX
       m1 ; ! change line back if needed.

LEXICON mX
 +N+Msc+Sg+Indef: K ;
     +N: R ;

!LEXICON mD ! av garde
! +N+Msc+Dat: K ;


LEXICON m4
+N+Msc+Pl+Indef: K ; ! flere stillongs
m1 ;

LEXICON m5
+N+Msc+Sg+Indef: K ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Def: K ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Indef: K ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Def: K ;


LEXICON m1 ! dag, hane
 +N: R       ;
     m1morph ;

LEXICON m1-e- ! stut, stuteplage
 +N: Re      ;
     m1morph ;

LEXICON m1morph
         +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en   ;
         +N+Msc+Pl: er-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG: ar-ane ;

LEXICON m1sg ! bruk
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
        +N: R    ;

LEXICON m1pl ! gamledager
 +N+Msc+Pl: er-ene ;

LEXICON m1X
         +N+Msc+Sg:   0-en   ;
         +N+Msc+Pl:Z1 er-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:Z1 ar-ane ;
                +N:   R      ;

LEXICON m1b ! dam
         +N+Msc+Sg:mX4 0-en   ;
         +N+Msc+Pl:m   er-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:m   ar-ane ;
                +N:    R      ;

LEXICON m1c ! fe, komite
         +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en   ;
         +N+Msc+Pl: er-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG: ar-ane ;
                +N: R      ;

LEXICON m1V ! sko
         +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en    ;
         +N+Msc+Pl: 0-ene-a ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG: 0-a   ;
                +N: R       ;

LEXICON m1Vb ! byte
         +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en     ;
         +N+Msc+Pl: 0-er-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG: 0-a   ;
                +N: R        ;

LEXICON m1Vc ! glipp
         +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en  ;
         +N+Msc+Pl: 0-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG: 0-a   ;
                +N: R     ;

LEXICON m2 ! lærer
 +N+Msc+Sg:        0-en   ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:        e-ne   ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%^NYNAG 0-en   ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%^NYNAG ar-ane ;
        +N:        R      ;


LEXICON m3 ! bever, bevere/bevrer/bevre
                +N+Msc+Sg:   0-en     ;
                +N+Msc+Pl:   e-ne     ; ! bevere, beverne
                +N+Msc+Pl:X1 e-er-ene ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:X1 ar-ane   ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
                       +N:   R        ;

LEXICON m3b ! finger, fingrer/fingre
                +N+Msc+Sg:   0-en     ;
                +N+Msc+Pl:X1 e-er-ene ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:X1 ar-ane   ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
                       +N:   R        ;

LEXICON m3c ! forelder, foreldre
                +N+Msc+Sg:   0-en     ;
                +N+Msc+Pl:X1 e-ene    ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:X1 ar-ane   ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
                       +N:   R        ;

LEXICON m3r ! onkel, onkler
                +N+Msc+Sg:   0-en     ;
                +N+Msc+Pl:X1 er-ene   ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:X1 ar-ane   ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
                +N:   R        ;

LEXICON m3V ! meter
 +N+Msc+Sg:   0-en  ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:X1 0-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Use/NG:X1 0-ane ;
        +N:   R     ;

LEXICON m1n3
  m1 ;
  n3 ;

LEXICON ma ! alliert
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-e ;
 +N+Msc+Pl: e-e ;
        +N: R   ;


!! #### Irregulars

LEXICON mKOLLEGA
 +N+Msc+Sg:   0-en   ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:X2 er-ene ; ! delete a, kolleger
 +N+Msc+Pl+Use/NG:   er-ene ; ! keep a, kollegaer
        +N:   R      ;

LEXICON mKONTO
         +N+Msc+Sg:     0-en   ;
         +N+Msc+Pl:X2i  0-ene  ; ! delete o
         +N+Msc+Pl+Use/NG:     er-ene ; ! Regular pl
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:     ar-ane ; ! Regular pl
                +N:     R      ;

LEXICON mRADIUS
         +N+Msc+Sg:%>us 0-en   ;
     +N+Msc+Sg+Def:%>en K      ; ! short def
         +N+Msc+Pl:     er-ene ; ! Regular pl
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:     ar-ane ; ! Regular pl
                +N:     R      ;

LEXICON mBROR
         +N+Msc+Sg:bror  0-en  ;
         +N+Msc+Pl:brødr e-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:brør  0-ne  ;

LEXICON mBRODER
         +N+Msc+Sg:broder 0-en  ;
         +N+Msc+Pl:brødr  e-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:brør   0-ne  ;

LEXICON mFAR
  +N+Msc+Sg:far  0-en  ;
  +N+Msc+Pl:fedr e-ene ;
!           +N:     R     ;


LEXICON mMANN
  +N+Msc+Sg:mann   0-en  ;
  +N+Msc+Pl:mannZ1 0-ene ;
!        +N:   R     ;

LEXICON indeclm !mX, eigentleg.
  +N+Msc+Indcl: # ;
!           +N: R ;

! Feminines
! ---------

LEXICON fx ! Former vx, awaiting classification.
  f1 ;

LEXICON fX ! førehand
 +N+Fem+Sg+Indef: # ;

!LEXICON fD ! i tide
! +N+Fem+Dat: K ;


LEXICON f1-e- ! helg
 +N: Re      ;
     f1morph ;

LEXICON f1 ! myr, krone
 +N: R       ;
     f1morph ;

LEXICON f1pl
 +N+Fem+Pl: er-ene ;

LEXICON f1morph
 +N+Fem+Sg: 0-a    ;
 +N+Msc+Sg: en     ; ! myren !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl: er-ene ;

LEXICON f1sg ! grisetang
 +N+Fem+Sg: 0-a ;
 +N+Msc+Sg: en  ; ! grisetangen !^C^
