src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON 3_letter
fut+CmpNP/None:fut m1-e- ; 
LEXICON Noun
handelsreisende m5 ;
helg f1-e- ;
gutt m1-e- ;
sprut m1-e- ;
stut m1-e- ;
utviklerrolle f1 ;
brudekofte f1 ;
villmarking f1 ;
valgordning f1 ;
asfaltering f1 ;
søppel f3n3d ;
arbeidsplikt f1 ;
nøtt f1-e- ;
hund m1-e- ;
image m1n2 ;
arbeidsstyrke m1 ;
manntallsstørrelse m1 ;
katalog m1 ;
numeral m1 ;
skrivefeil m1V ;
ekteordsfeil m1V ;
legemsfeil m1V ;
fanken indeclm ;
bånn indeclm ;
polarisasjon m1 ;
glipp m1Vc ;
reisepenger:reisepenge m1pl ;
kostpenger:kostpenge m1pl ;
tospråklighetsmidler:tospråklighetsmidle m1pl ;
nyheter:nyhete m1pl ;
skattefunksjonær m1 ;
katt m1-e- ;
kok m1n1 ;
publikum n1n1b ;
møtepublikum n1n1b ;
kinopublikum n1n1b ;
minoritetspublikum n1n1b ;
kinin m1n1 ;
stadion m1n1 ;
idrettsstadion m1n1 ;
hark m1Vcn1 ;
glepp m1Vc ;
kipp m1Vcn1 ;
idrettsleder m2 ;
sylinder m3 ;
mellomeuropeer m2 ;
sykepenger:sykepenge m1pl ;
tilleggspenger:tilleggspenge m1pl ;
beslutningstaker m2 ;
semitrailer m2 ;
anleggsgartner m2 ;
boreiser m2 ;
høstsemester m3 ;
røver m2 ;
lever m3f3 ;
fiskelever m3f3 ;
vaffel m3r ;
smeltedigel m3r ;
eksportartikkel m3r ;
endeklaringsvinkel m3r ;
fommel m3r ;
kjensel m3r ;
leirfivel m3r ;
alder m3 ;
forelder m3c ;
oldeforelder m3c ;
besteforelder m3c ;
olderforelder m3c ;
svigerforelder m3c ;
fosterforelder m3c ;
småbarnsforelder m3c ;
finger m3b ;
langfinger m3b ;
ringfinger m3b ;
tommelfinger m3b ;
øksehammer m3 ;
evakueringsvinter m3 ;
likestillingsminister m3 ;
orkester n1n3 ;
strykeorkester n1n3 ;
crescendo m1n3 ;
dakapo n1n3 ;
duodji m4 ;
longs m4 ;
stillongs m4 ;
tights m4 ;
shorts m4 ;
bermudashorts m4 ;
badeshorts m4 ;
kollega mKOLLEGA ;
arbeidskollega mKOLLEGA ;
tide fD ;
utide fD ;
måfå mD ;
garde mD ;
gårde mD ;
dage mD ;
topps mD ;
stede nD ;
fjells nD ;
urette mD ;
rette mD ;
froskemann:froske mMANN ;
yngstemann:yngste mMANN ;
vigselmann:vigsel mMANN ;
varaformann:varafor mMANN ;
stortingsmann:stortings mMANN ;
opphavsmann:opphavs mMANN ;
konto mKONTO ;
balansekonto:balansekonto mKONTO ;
bankkonto mKONTO ;
postgirokonto:postgirokonto mKONTO ;
diskonto mKONTO ;
oldefar:olde mFAR ;
tippoldefar:tippolde mFAR ;
familiefar:familie mFAR ;
stefar:ste mFAR ;
stamfar:stam mFAR ;
morfar:mor mFAR ;
fosterfar:foster mFAR ;
broder: mBRODER ;
urfolksbroder:urfolks mBRODER ;
fosterbror:foster mBROR ;
gudbror:gud mBROR ;
lillebror:lille mBROR ;
navnebror:navne mBROR ;
storebror:store mBROR ;
farbror:far mBROR ;
værbror:vær mBROR ;
radius:radi mRADIUS ;
førerrein m1V ;
spinnetein m1V ;
tresko m1V ;
kilo m1Vcn1 ;
nanometer m3V ;
millimeter m3V ;
desimeter m3V ;
centimeter m3V ;
kubikkmeter m3V ;
kilometer m3V ;
kvadratkilometer m3V ;
stand m1X ;
bonde m1X ;
husbonde m1X ;
melkebonde m1X ;
skattebonde m1X ;
sauebonde m1X ;
styrthjelm m1X ;
førehand fX ;
overhånd fX ;
forhånd fX ;
personalia mX ;
dagtid mX ;
fødende mX ;
høyre mX ;
bram mX ;
raison mX ;
cand.mag mX ;
kombinert ma ;
madam m1b ;
fattigdom m1b ;
folkesykdom m1b ;
grunneiendom m1b ;
spådom m1b ;
innbetalingsstrøm m1b ;
stamkafé m1c ;
kommunalkomité m1c ;
plankomité m1c ;
undervisningskomité m1c ;
industrikomite m1c ;
samarbeidskomite m1c ;
eksekutivkomite m1c ;
magesyke f1sg ;
sjokolademelk f1sg ;
surmelk f1sg ;
surmjølk f1sg ;
kreklingsaft f1sg ;
kornkli m1sg ;
costaricansk m1sg ;
udmurtisk m1sg ;
bekjennelsestro m1sg ;
lymfekreft m1sg ;
løssnø m1sg ;
gamledager:gamledage m1pl ;
juni indeclm ;
januar indeclm ;
desember indeclm ;
november indeclm ;
mars indeclm ;
uhyre fx ;
samrøre fx ;
gelendersprosse fx ;
niste fx ;
fånytte fx ;
midterflo fx ;
fotballsko m1V ;
juris mx ;
prent mx ;
prosjektansatt ma ;
ansatt ma ;
heltidsansatt ma ;
enkeltansatt ma ;
deltidsansatt ma ;
fiskeriansatt ma ;
jødedom m1b ;
byte m1Vb ;
kilobyte m1Vb ;
megabyte m1Vb ;
gigabyte m1Vb ;
terabyte m1Vb ;
petabyte m1Vb ;
exabyte m1Vb ;
dommedag m1 ;
villrede nD ;
utenlandshjelp f1sg ;
fødselsrier:fødselsri f1pl ;
lappesaker:lappesak f1pl ;
seinsommer m3 ;
småutgifter:småutgift f1pl ;
skrumplever m3f3 ;
ulikeverd mx ;
ridetime mx ;
selvstendighetsdag mx ;
sørpol mx ;
bymus mx ;
slepefartøy m1sg ;
